Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.040

Beef commission created—Generally.

There is hereby created a Washington state beef commission to be thus known and designated. The commission shall be composed of two beef producers, two dairy (beef) producers, two feeders, one livestock salesyard operator, one meat packer, and the director, who shall be a voting member. If an otherwise voting member is elected as the chair of the commission, the member may, during the member's term as chair of the commission, cast a vote as a member of the commission only to break a tie vote. If the commission so chooses, there may be one additional nonvoting member in an advisory capacity appointed by the members of the commission for such a term as the members may set.

A majority of voting members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business.

All appointed members as stated in RCW 16.67.060 shall be citizens and residents of this state, over the age of twenty-five years, each of whom is and has been actually engaged in that phase of the cattle industry he or she represents for a period of five years, and has during that period derived a substantial portion of his or her income therefrom, or have a substantial investment in cattle as an owner, lessee, partner, or a stockholder owning at least ten percent of the voting stock in a corporation engaged in the production of cattle or dressed beef, or a manager or executive officer of such corporation. Producer members of the commission shall not be directly engaged in the business of being a meat packer, or as a feeder, feeding cattle other than their own. Said qualifications must continue throughout each member's term of office.

[ 2003 c 396 s 33; 2000 c 146 s 1; 1997 c 363 s 1; 1993 c 40 s 1; 1991 c 9 s 1; 1969 c 133 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.

Effective date—1993 c 40: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 40 s 5.]